Utah statutes.
31A-35-702.   Early surrender without cause.

(1) The bail or bail bond premium shall be returned in full if a bail bond producer without good cause surrenders a defendant to custody before:

(a)  the time specified in the undertaking of bail or the bail bond for the appearance of the defendant; or

(b)  any other occasion where the presence of the defendant in court is lawfully required.

(2)  As used in this section, "good cause" includes:

(a)  the defendant providing materially false information on the application for bail or a bail bond;

(b)  the court's increasing the amount of bail beyond sound underwriting criteria employed by:

(i)  the bail bond producer; or

(ii)  the bail bond surety;

(c)  a material and detrimental change in the collateral posted by:

(i)  the defendant; or

(ii)  a person acting on the defendant's behalf;

(d)  the defendant changing the defendant's address or telephone number without giving reasonable notice to:

(i)  the bail bond producer; or

(ii)  the bail bond surety;

(e)  the defendant commits another crime, other than a minor traffic violation, as defined by department rule, while on bail;

(f)  failure by the defendant to appear in court at the appointed time; or

(g)  a finding of guilt against the defendant by a court of competent jurisdiction.



Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

